Utah statutes.
78A-2-602.   Court Security Account established -- Funding -- Uses.
(1)  There is created a restricted account in the General Fund known as the
Court Security Account.
(2)  The state treasurer shall deposit in the Court Security Account:
(a)  collected money from the surcharge established in Section 78A-2-601;
(b)  money from the portion of filing fees established in Subsections
78A-2-301(1)(j)(iv) and (v); and
(c)  amounts designated by Subsection 78A-7-122(4)(b)(ii).
(3)  The Administrative Office of the Courts shall use the allocation to
contract for court security at all district and juvenile courts throughout the
state.
